Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4721.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 214.40, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. (a) The definitions in this subdivision apply to this section. (b) "Administrative services unit" means the administrative services unit for the health-related licensing boards. (c) "Charitable organization" means a charitable organization within the meaning of section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code that has as a purpose the sponsorship or support of programs designed to improve the quality, awareness, and availability of health care services and that serves as a funding mechanism for providing those services. (d) "Health care facility or organization" means a health care facility licensed under chapter 144 or 144A, or a charitable organization. (e) "Health care provider" means a physician licensed under chapter 147deleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end physician assistant licensed and practicing under chapter 147Adeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end nurse licensed and registered to practice under chapter 148deleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end dentist, dental hygienist, or dental therapist licensed under chapter 150Adeleted text begin , or andeleted text end new text begin ;new text end advanced dental therapist licensed and certified under chapter 150Anew text begin ; physical therapist licensed under sections 148.65 to 148.78; occupational therapist licensed under sections 148.6401 to 148.645; or speech-language pathologist or audiologist licensed under sections 148.511 to 148.5198new text end . (f) "Health care services" means health promotion, health monitoring, health education, diagnosis, treatment, minor surgical procedures, the administration of local anesthesia for the stitching of wounds, and primary dental services, including preventive, diagnostic, restorative, and emergency treatment. Health care services do not include the administration of general anesthesia or surgical procedures other than minor surgical procedures. (g) "Medical professional liability insurance" means insurance against loss, damage, or expense incident to a claim arising out of the death or injury of any person as the result of negligence or malpractice in rendering licensed health care provider professional services as defined by section 62I.03, subdivision 8.